Hawaii statutes.
§651-52 Indemnity, how collected.
Bonds of indemnity given to an officer, as provided in section 651-51, shall be
collectible by the officer receiving the same, upon citation to show cause and
proof of the signatures thereto, without the intervention of a jury, and the
damages to be assessed thereon shall be the amount recovered against the
officer, with interest and costs of suit, and the expenses of the citation and
judgment of indemnity, for which execution may be issued against the co-obligors,
both jointly and severally, leviable as in other cases of indebtedness. [CC
1859, §1034; RL 1925, §2454; RL 1935, §4155; RL 1945, §10182; RL 1955, §233-51;
HRS §651-52]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next